Illinois, session 104th, SB1282.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Senior Citizens and Persons with 5Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act is amended by changing 6Section 4 as follows: 7    (320 ILCS 25/4)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 404)8    Sec. 4. Amount of Grant. 9    (a) In general. Any individual 65 years or older or any 10individual who will become 65 years old during the calendar 11year in which a claim is filed, and any surviving spouse of 12such a claimant, who at the time of death received or was 13entitled to receive a grant pursuant to this Section, which 14surviving spouse will become 65 years of age within the 24 15months immediately following the death of such claimant and 16which surviving spouse but for his or her age is otherwise 17qualified to receive a grant pursuant to this Section, and any 18person with a disability whose annual household income is less 19than the income eligibility limitation, as defined in 20subsection (a-5) and whose household is liable for payment of 21property taxes accrued or has paid rent constituting property 22taxes accrued and is domiciled in this State at the time he or 23she files his or her claim is entitled to claim a grant under   SB1282- 2 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1this Act. With respect to claims filed by individuals who will 2become 65 years old during the calendar year in which a claim 3is filed, the amount of any grant to which that household is 4entitled shall be an amount equal to 1/12 of the amount to 5which the claimant would otherwise be entitled as provided in 6this Section, multiplied by the number of months in which the 7claimant was 65 in the calendar year in which the claim is 8filed.9    (a-5) Income eligibility limitation. For purposes of this 10Section, "income eligibility limitation" means an amount for 11grant years 2008 through 2019:12        (1) less than $22,218 for a household containing one 13    person;14        (2) less than $29,480 for a household containing 2 15    persons; or16        (3) less than $36,740 for a household containing 3 or 17    more persons.18    For grant years 2020 and thereafter:19        (1) less than $33,562 for a household containing one 20    person;21        (2) less than $44,533 for a household containing 2 22    persons; or23        (3) less than $55,500 for a household containing 3 or 24    more persons. 25    For 2009 claim year applications submitted during calendar 26year 2010, a household must have annual household income of   SB1282- 3 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1less than $27,610 for a household containing one person; less 2than $36,635 for a household containing 2 persons; or less 3than $45,657 for a household containing 3 or more persons.4     The Department on Aging shall may adopt rules such that on 5January 1, 2026 2011, and thereafter, the foregoing household 6income eligibility limits shall may be changed to reflect the 7annual cost of living adjustment in Social Security and 8Supplemental Security Income benefits that are applicable to 9the year for which those benefits are being reported as income 10on an application.11    If a person files as a surviving spouse, then only his or 12her income shall be counted in determining his or her 13household income. 14    (b) Limitation. Except as otherwise provided in 15subsections (a) and (f) of this Section, the maximum amount of 16grant which a claimant is entitled to claim is the amount by 17which the property taxes accrued which were paid or payable 18during the last preceding tax year or rent constituting 19property taxes accrued upon the claimant's residence for the 20last preceding taxable year exceeds 3 1/2% of the claimant's 21household income for that year but in no event is the grant to 22exceed (i) $700 less 4.5% of household income for that year for 23those with a household income of $14,000 or less or (ii) $70 if 24household income for that year is more than $14,000.25    (c) Public aid recipients. If household income in one or 26more months during a year includes cash assistance in excess   SB1282- 4 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1of $55 per month from the Department of Healthcare and Family 2Services or the Department of Human Services (acting as 3successor to the Department of Public Aid under the Department 4of Human Services Act) which was determined under regulations 5of that Department on a measure of need that included an 6allowance for actual rent or property taxes paid by the 7recipient of that assistance, the amount of grant to which 8that household is entitled, except as otherwise provided in 9subsection (a), shall be the product of (1) the maximum amount 10computed as specified in subsection (b) of this Section and 11(2) the ratio of the number of months in which household income 12did not include such cash assistance over $55 to the number 13twelve. If household income did not include such cash 14assistance over $55 for any months during the year, the amount 15of the grant to which the household is entitled shall be the 16maximum amount computed as specified in subsection (b) of this 17Section. For purposes of this paragraph (c), "cash assistance" 18does not include any amount received under the federal 19Supplemental Security Income (SSI) program.20    (d) Joint ownership. If title to the residence is held 21jointly by the claimant with a person who is not a member of 22his or her household, the amount of property taxes accrued 23used in computing the amount of grant to which he or she is 24entitled shall be the same percentage of property taxes 25accrued as is the percentage of ownership held by the claimant 26in the residence.  SB1282- 5 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1    (e) More than one residence. If a claimant has occupied 2more than one residence in the taxable year, he or she may 3claim only one residence for any part of a month. In the case 4of property taxes accrued, he or she shall prorate 1/12 of the 5total property taxes accrued on his or her residence to each 6month that he or she owned and occupied that residence; and, in 7the case of rent constituting property taxes accrued, shall 8prorate each month's rent payments to the residence actually 9occupied during that month.10    (f) (Blank).11    (g) Effective January 1, 2006, there is hereby established 12a program of pharmaceutical assistance to the aged and to 13persons with disabilities, entitled the Illinois Seniors and 14Disabled Drug Coverage Program, which shall be administered by 15the Department of Healthcare and Family Services and the 16Department on Aging in accordance with this subsection, to 17consist of coverage of specified prescription drugs on behalf 18of beneficiaries of the program as set forth in this 19subsection. Notwithstanding any provisions of this Act to the 20contrary, on and after July 1, 2012, pharmaceutical assistance 21under this Act shall no longer be provided, and on July 1, 2012 22the Illinois Senior Citizens and Disabled Persons 23Pharmaceutical Assistance Program shall terminate. The 24following provisions that concern the Illinois Senior Citizens 25and Disabled Persons Pharmaceutical Assistance Program shall 26continue to apply on and after July 1, 2012 to the extent   SB1282- 6 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1necessary to pursue any actions authorized by subsection (d) 2of Section 9 of this Act with respect to acts which took place 3prior to July 1, 2012.4    To become a beneficiary under the program established 5under this subsection, a person must:6        (1) be (i) 65 years of age or older or (ii) a person 7    with a disability; and8        (2) be domiciled in this State; and9        (3) enroll with a qualified Medicare Part D 10    Prescription Drug Plan if eligible and apply for all 11    available subsidies under Medicare Part D; and12        (4) for the 2006 and 2007 claim years, have a maximum 13    household income of (i) less than $21,218 for a household 14    containing one person, (ii) less than $28,480 for a 15    household containing 2 persons, or (iii) less than $35,740 16    for a household containing 3 or more persons; and17        (5) for the 2008 claim year, have a maximum household 18    income of (i) less than $22,218 for a household containing 19    one person, (ii) $29,480 for a household containing 2 20    persons, or (iii) $36,740 for a household containing 3 or 21    more persons; and22        (6) for 2009 claim year applications submitted during 23    calendar year 2010, have annual household income of less 24    than (i) $27,610 for a household containing one person; 25    (ii) less than $36,635 for a household containing 2 26    persons; or (iii) less than $45,657 for a household   SB1282- 7 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1    containing 3 or more persons; and2        (7) as of September 1, 2011, have a maximum household 3    income at or below 200% of the federal poverty level. 4    All individuals enrolled as of December 31, 2005, in the 5pharmaceutical assistance program operated pursuant to 6subsection (f) of this Section and all individuals enrolled as 7of December 31, 2005, in the SeniorCare Medicaid waiver 8program operated pursuant to Section 5-5.12a of the Illinois 9Public Aid Code shall be automatically enrolled in the program 10established by this subsection for the first year of operation 11without the need for further application, except that they 12must apply for Medicare Part D and the Low Income Subsidy under 13Medicare Part D. A person enrolled in the pharmaceutical 14assistance program operated pursuant to subsection (f) of this 15Section as of December 31, 2005, shall not lose eligibility in 16future years due only to the fact that they have not reached 17the age of 65.18    To the extent permitted by federal law, the Department may 19act as an authorized representative of a beneficiary in order 20to enroll the beneficiary in a Medicare Part D Prescription 21Drug Plan if the beneficiary has failed to choose a plan and, 22where possible, to enroll beneficiaries in the low-income 23subsidy program under Medicare Part D or assist them in 24enrolling in that program.25    Beneficiaries under the program established under this 26subsection shall be divided into the following 4 eligibility   SB1282- 8 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1groups:2        (A) Eligibility Group 1 shall consist of beneficiaries 3    who are not eligible for Medicare Part D coverage and who 4    are:5            (i) a person with a disability and under age 65; or6            (ii) age 65 or older, with incomes over 200% of the 7        Federal Poverty Level; or8            (iii) age 65 or older, with incomes at or below 9        200% of the Federal Poverty Level and not eligible for 10        federally funded means-tested benefits due to 11        immigration status.12        (B) Eligibility Group 2 shall consist of beneficiaries 13    who are eligible for Medicare Part D coverage.14        (C) Eligibility Group 3 shall consist of beneficiaries 15    age 65 or older, with incomes at or below 200% of the 16    Federal Poverty Level, who are not barred from receiving 17    federally funded means-tested benefits due to immigration 18    status and are not eligible for Medicare Part D coverage.19        If the State applies and receives federal approval for 20    a waiver under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 21    persons in Eligibility Group 3 shall continue to receive 22    benefits through the approved waiver, and Eligibility 23    Group 3 may be expanded to include persons with 24    disabilities who are under age 65 with incomes under 200% 25    of the Federal Poverty Level who are not eligible for 26    Medicare and who are not barred from receiving federally   SB1282- 9 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1    funded means-tested benefits due to immigration status.2        (D) Eligibility Group 4 shall consist of beneficiaries 3    who are otherwise described in Eligibility Group 2 who 4    have a diagnosis of HIV or AIDS. 5    The program established under this subsection shall cover 6the cost of covered prescription drugs in excess of the 7beneficiary cost-sharing amounts set forth in this paragraph 8that are not covered by Medicare. The Department of Healthcare 9and Family Services may establish by emergency rule changes in 10cost-sharing necessary to conform the cost of the program to 11the amounts appropriated for State fiscal year 2012 and future 12fiscal years except that the 24-month limitation on the 13adoption of emergency rules and the provisions of Sections 145-115 and 5-125 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act 15shall not apply to rules adopted under this subsection (g). 16The adoption of emergency rules authorized by this subsection 17(g) shall be deemed to be necessary for the public interest, 18safety, and welfare. 19    For purposes of the program established under this 20subsection, the term "covered prescription drug" has the 21following meanings:22        For Eligibility Group 1, "covered prescription drug" 23    means: (1) any cardiovascular agent or drug; (2) any 24    insulin or other prescription drug used in the treatment 25    of diabetes, including syringe and needles used to 26    administer the insulin; (3) any prescription drug used in   SB1282- 10 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1    the treatment of arthritis; (4) any prescription drug used 2    in the treatment of cancer; (5) any prescription drug used 3    in the treatment of Alzheimer's disease; (6) any 4    prescription drug used in the treatment of Parkinson's 5    disease; (7) any prescription drug used in the treatment 6    of glaucoma; (8) any prescription drug used in the 7    treatment of lung disease and smoking-related illnesses; 8    (9) any prescription drug used in the treatment of 9    osteoporosis; and (10) any prescription drug used in the 10    treatment of multiple sclerosis. The Department may add 11    additional therapeutic classes by rule. The Department may 12    adopt a preferred drug list within any of the classes of 13    drugs described in items (1) through (10) of this 14    paragraph. The specific drugs or therapeutic classes of 15    covered prescription drugs shall be indicated by rule.16        For Eligibility Group 2, "covered prescription drug" 17    means those drugs covered by the Medicare Part D 18    Prescription Drug Plan in which the beneficiary is 19    enrolled.20        For Eligibility Group 3, "covered prescription drug" 21    means those drugs covered by the Medical Assistance 22    Program under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code.23        For Eligibility Group 4, "covered prescription drug" 24    means those drugs covered by the Medicare Part D 25    Prescription Drug Plan in which the beneficiary is 26    enrolled.  SB1282- 11 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1    Any person otherwise eligible for pharmaceutical 2assistance under this subsection whose covered drugs are 3covered by any public program is ineligible for assistance 4under this subsection to the extent that the cost of those 5drugs is covered by the other program.6    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 7establish by rule the methods by which it will provide for the 8coverage called for in this subsection. Those methods may 9include direct reimbursement to pharmacies or the payment of a 10capitated amount to Medicare Part D Prescription Drug Plans.11    For a pharmacy to be reimbursed under the program 12established under this subsection, it must comply with rules 13adopted by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 14regarding coordination of benefits with Medicare Part D 15Prescription Drug Plans. A pharmacy may not charge a 16Medicare-enrolled beneficiary of the program established under 17this subsection more for a covered prescription drug than the 18appropriate Medicare cost-sharing less any payment from or on 19behalf of the Department of Healthcare and Family Services.20    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services or the 21Department on Aging, as appropriate, may adopt rules regarding 22applications, counting of income, proof of Medicare status, 23mandatory generic policies, and pharmacy reimbursement rates 24and any other rules necessary for the cost-efficient operation 25of the program established under this subsection.26    (h) A qualified individual is not entitled to duplicate   SB1282- 12 -LRB104 05810 KTG 15841 b1benefits in a coverage period as a result of the changes made 2by this amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly. 3(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19.)